Hawaii, session 2026, HB181.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1. The legislature finds that Hawaii has unique landscapes and natural environments that make it a very desirable and popular film location.  The world's filmmakers come to Hawaii for universally tropical and natural locations under secure, familiar, and professional production circumstances. The legislature further finds that in the past, Hawaii has been known as "Hollywood's tropical backlot" due to the number of high-profile films and television shows filmed in Hawaii. As the most geographically isolated land mass on Earth, Hawaii is home to eleven of the world's thirteen climate zones.  No other place offers more convenient, diverse, or magnificent filming opportunities. Hawaii features an active volcano, volcanic craters the size of Manhattan, snow‑capped mountain peaks, dense jungles, cattle ranches, the tallest sea cliffs, and some of the best beaches in the world.  As the film industry continues to evolve and its technology continues to develop, the State needs to ensure that Hawaii and its beautiful, iconic locations are protected and preserved. The purpose of this Act is to require the department of business, economic development, and tourism to fix the payment of royalties to the State for the filming of scenic shots of iconic locations in the State that are subsequently featured in media for production purposes. SECTION 2.  Chapter 201, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part IX to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§201-     Iconic location royalties.  (a) The department shall fix the payment of royalties to the State for the filming of scenic shots of iconic locations in the State that are subsequently featured in media for production purposes; provided that state and county productions shall be exempt from this section. (b) The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 for the purposes of this section, including: (1)  Establishing the basis upon which the amount and duration of royalty payments to the State will be fixed; and (2)  Defining "iconic locations" and "scenic shots". (c) All royalty payments received pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the general fund. (d) For the purposes of this section, "production" has the same meaning as in section 235‑17." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________